Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 52
HOGS

Cross references:

For regulation of commercial hog facilities, see §§ 25-7-138 and 25-8-501.1.

Section

35-52-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Garbage" means all refuse, animal or vegetable, and includes all waste material, by-products of a kitchen, restaurant, hospital, hotel, or slaughterhouse, and every refuse accumulation of animal, fruit, or vegetable matter, liquid or otherwise, but excludes such vegetable products as leaves and tops of vegetable plants which have not been mixed with or exposed to or which do not contain any other garbage or waste product prior to feeding to swine.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 229, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-12.

35-52-102. Importing hogs - affidavit. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 596, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3259.

CSA:

C. 160, § 189.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-1.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-103. Cars must be disinfected. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 596, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3260.

CSA:

C. 160, § 190.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-2.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-104. Disposition of copies of affidavit. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 596, § 3.

C.L.

§ 3261.

CSA:

C. 160, § 191.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-3.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-105. Cars placarded. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 597, § 4.

C.L.

§ 3262.

CSA:

C. 160, § 192.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-4.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-106. Railroad stockyards disinfected. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 597, § 5.

C.L.

§ 3263.

CSA:

C. 160, § 193.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-5.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-107. Chutes and yards disinfected. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 597, § 6.

C.L.

§ 3264.

CSA:

C. 160, § 194.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-6.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-108. Local shipments treated as interstate. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 597, § 7.

C.L.

§ 3265.

CSA:

C. 160, § 195.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-7.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-109. Handling at destination. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 597, § 8.

C.L.

§ 3266.

CSA:

C. 160, § 196.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-8.

L. 65:

p. 228, § 1.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-110. Dead hogs burned. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 598, § 9.

C.L.

§ 3267.

CSA:

C. 160, § 197.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-9.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-111. Penalty.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation violating the provisions of this article 52 commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 598, § 10.

C.L.

§ 3268.

CSA:

C. 160, § 198.

CRS 53:

§ 8-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-10.

L. 65:

p. 228, § 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3284, § 650, effective March 1, 2022.

35-52-111.1. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or of any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or the commissioner. The penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation; except that such penalty may be doubled if it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, that the person has violated the provision or rule on at least one prior occasion occurring after March 23, 1995.

No civil penalty may be imposed by the commissioner unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect the civil penalty, or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the court or the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the person charged.

All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the general fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 69, § 4, effective March 23.

35-52-111.2. Enforcement.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue an order requiring any person to cease and desist from such violation. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease immediately. At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request a prompt hearing to determine whether or not such violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and shall be determined promptly.

Whenever the commissioner possesses evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule adopted under this article, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 69, § 4, effective March 23.

35-52-112. Selling, distributing, and using virulent virus. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 65:

p. 229, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-11.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.

35-52-113. Garbage cooking.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or corporation, including eleemosynary institutions, to feed garbage to animals unless such garbage has been heated throughout to boiling or equivalent temperature for thirty minutes or heated according to a method specifically promulgated by the state agricultural commission; but this requirement shall not apply to an individual who feeds to his own animals only the garbage obtained from his household.

Garbage to be fed to swine located within the state of Colorado shall be cooked or heated as provided in subsection (1) of this section by one or more of the following methods:

Wet steaming or boiling in an open vat;

Dry steaming or boiling in a jacketed kettle;

Steaming in a pressure cylinder;

Steam boilers; or

Direct heating.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 229, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-13.

35-52-114. Permit to be obtained.

Prior to the feeding of garbage to any swine located in the state of Colorado, the owner or feeder, as the case may be, shall first obtain a permit from the state agricultural commission. The applicant for a garbage feeding permit shall certify in the application that he has facilities for cooking garbage in one or more of the methods described in section 35-52-113 (2). The state agricultural commission must, within a reasonable time, ascertain that such facilities are as represented and, if the requirements of section 35-52-113 can be fulfilled, issue a permit to the applicant.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 230, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-14.

35-52-115. Revocation of permit.

Upon receipt of evidence that any person having a permit under this article has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions of this article or any of the rules or regulations promulgated under this article, the state agricultural commission may order a hearing for the purpose of reviewing the evidence and determining the true facts. If said facts support the violation, the commission may revoke such permit or may refuse to issue a permit to an applicant therefor.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 230, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-15.

35-52-116. Premises sanitation.

Premises shall be free of collections of unused garbage and waste materials. Rat and fly control measures shall be practiced as a further means of prevention of the spread of diseases.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 230, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-16.

35-52-117. Premises inspection.

Any authorized representative of the department of agriculture shall have the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purpose of inspection and investigation of the conditions relating to the treating of garbage to be fed to swine as required by this article.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 230, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-17.

35-52-118. Administration and equipment.

The department of agriculture is charged with administration and enforcement of this article in conjunction with such rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the state agricultural commission to carry out its provisions.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 230, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-18.

35-52-119. Exclusions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 65:

p. 230, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-6-19.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 1724, § 1, effective April 29.